test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-moonnyd_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup




Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - mõõnnâd: # Verb 'to go' - full paradigm
     mõõnnâd+V+Inf: mõõnnâd
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mõõnam
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: mõõnak
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mâânn
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: mõõnnâp
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: mõõnnveʹted
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: mâʹnne
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: mõõnât
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: mõõn
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: mõʹnnem
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: mõʹnniǩ
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: mõõni
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [mõõnim, mõõnin]
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: mõõnid
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: mõʹnne
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: mõʹnneš
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: mõõnnâm
     mõõnnâd+V+Pot+Sg1: mõõnžem
     mõõnnâd+V+Pot+Sg2: mõõnžiǩ
     mõõnnâd+V+Pot+Sg3: mõõnâž
     mõõnnâd+V+Pot+Pl1: [mõõnžep, mõõnžim, mõõnžin]
     mõõnnâd+V+Pot+Pl2: mõõnžid
     mõõnnâd+V+Pot+Pl3: mõõnže
     mõõnnâd+V+Pot+Sg4: mõõnžet
     mõõnnâd+V+Pot+ConNeg: mõõnže
     mõõnnâd+V+Cond+Sg1: mõõnčem
     mõõnnâd+V+Cond+Sg2: mõõnčiǩ
     mõõnnâd+V+Cond+Sg3: mõõnči
     mõõnnâd+V+Cond+Pl1: [mõõnčim, mõõnčin, mõõnčep]
     mõõnnâd+V+Cond+Pl2: mõõnčid
     mõõnnâd+V+Cond+Pl3: mõõnče
     mõõnnâd+V+Cond+Sg4: mõõnčeš
     mõõnnâd+V+Cond+ConNeg: mõõnče
     mõõnnâd+V+Imprt+Sg2: mõõn
     mõõnnâd+V+Imprt+Sg3: mâânas
     mõõnnâd+V+Imprt+Pl1: mõõnnâp
     mõõnnâd+V+Imprt+Pl2: mõõnnâd
     mõõnnâd+V+Imprt+Pl3: mânnaz
     mõõnnâd+V+Imprt+ConNeg: mõõn
     mõõnnâd+V+Imprt+ConNegII: mõnnu
     mõõnnâd+V+Actio+Ess: mõõnnmen
     mõõnnâd+V+Actio: mõõnnâm
     mõõnnâd+V+Act+PrsPrc: mõõnni
     mõõnnâd+V+Act+PrfPrc: mõõnnâm
     mõõnnâd+V+Pass+PrfPrc: mõnnum
     mõõnnâd+V+VAbess: [mõõnǩeânai, mõõnkâni, mõõnkani, mõõnǩâni, mõõnǩani]
     mõõnnâd+V+Ger+Ess: mõõneen
     mõõnnâd+V+Ger+Instr: mõõneeʹl
